it: Necessità di assemblare il playset: Richiesto il montaggio da parte di un adulto; Montaggio minimo (a incastro); Nessun montaggio richiesto; Altro
nb: Krever montering av lekesett: Må monteres av en voksen; Minimal montering (klikkfeste); Ingen montering kreves; Annet
pt-BR: Playset de brinquedo montagem necessária: Requer montagem por um adulto; Montagem mínima (encaixe rápido); Não requer montagem; Outros
nl: Speelset montage vereist: Montage door volwassene vereist; Minimale montage (klik-bevestiging); Geen montage vereist; Overig
ko: 장난감 놀이 세트 조립 필요 여부: 성인 조립 필요; 최소 조립(스냅핏); 조립 불필요; 기타
da: Samling kræves for legesæt: Skal samles af en voksen; Minimal samling (klikkes sammen); Kræver ikke samling; Andet
pl: Wymóg składania zestawu do zabawy: Wymagany montaż przez osobę dorosłą; Minimalny montaż (na zatrzask); Nie wymaga montażu; Inne
fr: Assemblage requis pour l’ensemble de jeu: Assemblage par un adulte requis; Assemblage minimal (emboîtable); Aucun assemblage requis; Autre
es: Montaje requerido del set de juguetes: Requiere ensamblaje por un adulto; Ensamblaje mínimo (a presión); No requiere ensamblaje; Otro
sk-SK: Vyžaduje sa montáž hračkárskej súpravy: Vyžaduje sa montáž dospelou osobou; Minimálna montáž (zasunutie); Nevyžaduje sa montáž; Iné
sl-SI: Zahtevano sestavljanje igralnega kompleta: Sestaviti mora odrasla oseba; Minimalno sestavljanje (na zatič); Sestavljanje ni potrebno; Drugo
hu: Szükséges-e a játékkészlet összeszerelése: Felnőtt általi összeszerelést igényel; Minimális összeszerelés (bepattintható); Nem igényel összeszerelést; Egyéb
el: Απαιτείται συναρμολόγηση σετ παιχνιδιού: Απαιτείται συναρμολόγηση από ενήλικα; Ελάχιστη συναρμολόγηση (κουμπωτό); Δεν απαιτείται συναρμολόγηση; Άλλο
fi: Leikkivälinesarja, joka edellyttää kokoamista: Aikuisen koottava; Minimaalinen kokoaminen (napsautettava); Ei vaadi kokoamista; Muu
en: Toy playset assembly required: Adult assembly required; Minimal assembly (snap-fit); No assembly required; Other
de: Montage des Spielsets erforderlich: Montage durch Erwachsene erforderlich; Minimale Montage (Stecksystem); Keine Montage erforderlich; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 玩具套装需要组装: 需要成人组装; 最少组装（卡扣拼装）; 无需组装; 其他
ro-RO: Necesită asamblarea setului de jucărie: Necesită asamblare de către un adult; Asamblare minimă (prindere prin cleme); Nu necesită asamblare; Altele
ja: おもちゃのプレイセット組み立て要否: 大人の組み立てが必要; 最小限の組み立て (スナップフィット); 組み立て不要; その他
zh-TW: 玩具組需要組裝: 需成人組裝; 最少組裝 (卡扣); 不需組裝; 其他
lt-LT: Reikalingas žaislų rinkinio surinkimas: Turi surinkti suaugusysis; Minimalus surinkimas (įspaudžiamos detalės); Surinkti nereikia; Kita
cs: Herní sada vyžaduje montáž: Vyžaduje se montáž dospělou osobou; Minimální montáž (zacvakávací spoje); Není vyžadována žádná montáž; Jiné
sv: Montering av leksaksset krävs: Montering av vuxen krävs; Minimal montering (klickfäste); Ingen montering krävs; Övrigt
vi: Cần lắp ráp bộ đồ chơi.: Yêu cầu người lớn lắp ráp; Lắp ráp cơ bản (lắp khớp); Không yêu cầu lắp ráp; Khác
th: ชุดของเล่นต้องประกอบเอง: ต้องให้ผู้ใหญ่ประกอบ; ประกอบเพียงเล็กน้อย (แบบล็อกติดกัน); ไม่ต้องประกอบ; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Montagem necessária para o conjunto de brinquedo: Requer montagem por um adulto; Montagem mínima (encaixe); Não requer montagem; Outro
bg-BG: Необходимост от сглобяване на детския комплект за игра: Изисква се сглобяване от възрастен; Минимално сглобяване (с щракване); Не се изисква сглобяване; Друго
hr-HR: Potrebno je sastavljanje kompleta igračaka: Potrebno je da sastavi odrasla osoba; Minimalno sastavljanje (na klik); Sastavljanje nije potrebno; Ostalo
tr: Oyuncak oyun seti montaj gereksinimi: Yetişkin tarafından kurulmalıdır; Minimum kurulum (geçmeli); Kurulum gerektirmez; Diğer
ru: Требуется сборка игрового набора: Требуется сборка взрослыми; Минимальная сборка (на защелках); Сборка не требуется; Другое